Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.040

Certification—Official code—Prima facie evidence.

The Revised Code of Washington containing the certificate of the temporary code committee and any supplement or addition thereto or reprint edition thereof, which contains the certificate of the statute law committee referred to in RCW 1.08.037, shall be deemed official, and shall be prima facie evidence of the laws contained therein.

[ 1955 c 5 s 2; 1953 c 257 s 15; 1951 c 157 s 16; 1941 c 149 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 152-38.]